Utah statutes.
63C-13-103.   Creation of Prison Relocation and Development Authority -- Members.

(1)  There is created a prison relocation and development authority.

(2) (a)  The authority consists of 11 members.

(b)  Two members of the authority shall be appointed by the legislative body of the municipality in whose boundary the prison property is presently located.

(c)  Four members of the authority shall be appointed by the governor.

(d)  One member shall be appointed by the Utah Association of Counties.

(e)  Two members shall be members of the Senate appointed by the president of the Senate.

(f)  Two members shall be members of the House of Representatives appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives.

(3)  Any vacancy shall be filled in the same manner under this section as the appointment of the member whose vacancy is being filled.

(4)  Each member of the authority shall serve until a successor is duly appointed and qualified.

(5)  A member may not receive compensation for service on the authority.

(6)  A majority of members present at a meeting constitutes a quorum.

